Wyoming, session 2025, HB0249.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-5-601 and 22-6-131 are created to
read:

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
ARTICLE 6
RUNOFF ELECTIONS

22-5-601. Runoff elections for nominations.

(a) For nominations for governor, secretary of state,
state treasurer, state auditor, state superintendent of
public instruction and any federal office, a runoff
election shall be held with respect to that nomination if
no candidate, including any write-in candidate, receives
more than fifty percent (50%) of the votes cast for the
respective partisan office on the primary ballot. The
candidates in the runoff election shall be the two (2)
candidates who received the highest number of votes in
their respective partisan primary election except:

(i) If more than two (2) candidates in a
partisan primary election for the offices specified in this
subsection tie for the highest number of votes in the
primary election, the state canvassing board shall cast
lots to determine which two (2) shall be runoff election
candidates; or

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(ii) If two (2) or more candidates in a partisan
primary election for the offices specified in this
subsection tie for the second highest number of votes in
the primary election, the state canvassing board shall cast
lots to determine who shall be the second candidate in the
runoff election.

(b) Notwithstanding W.S. 22-5-401, if any candidate
eligible to be in a runoff election withdraws, dies or is
determined ineligible before the runoff election, that
candidate shall be ineligible for the runoff election and
the two (2) remaining eligible candidates receiving the
highest number of votes in accordance with subsection (a)
of this section shall be the candidates in the runoff
election.

(c) If required under this section, runoff elections
shall be held on the first Tuesday after the second Monday
in August in general election years.

(d) The candidate who receives the highest number of
votes in the runoff election shall be nominated.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(e) In the event of a tie in a runoff election, the
state canvassing board shall cast lots in the manner
prescribed by W.S. 22-16-119.

(f) To the extent this section conflicts with other
sections of this Election Code, this section shall apply.

(g) All costs incurred in carrying out a runoff
election under this section shall be borne by the secretary
of state, who shall reimburse the county treasurer for the
costs paid by the county for the runoff election.

(h) There is created the runoff election account.
Funds in the account shall not revert and are continuously
appropriated to the secretary of state for costs related to
administering runoff elections as provided in this section.
The state treasurer shall invest funds within the account
in accordance with law. All investment earnings from the
account shall be deposited in the general fund.

22-6-131. Format of runoff election ballot.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(a) Each primary runoff election ballot for major
political parties required under W.S. 22-5-601 shall be
printed in substantial compliance with the following:

(i) Across the top shall be printed "Official
Runoff Election Ballot" followed by the name of the major
political party;

(ii) On the first line shall be printed the
county in which the ballot is used, the date of the
election and blank lines for entry of the election district
and precinct;

(iii) On the second line shall be printed the
following instructions: "To vote for a person whose name is
printed on the ballot, mark the square immediately adjacent
to the name of the person for whom you desire to vote. To
vote for a person whose name is not printed on the ballot,
write the person's name in the blank space provided for
that purpose and mark the square immediately adjacent to
the name of the person.";

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(iv) Candidates for different offices in the
same runoff election shall be arranged in separate groups
in the order specified by W.S. 22-6-117. At the top of each
group shall appear the title of the office. Adjacent to the
title of the office shall be printed "Vote for one";

(v) Below the list of candidates in each group
shall be printed a blank line for a write-in candidate;

(vi) Adjacent to the name of each candidate and
blank line shall be printed a square for marking the vote.
No square shall appear at the top of a column.

Section 2. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxx)(E) and (lii),
22-2-101(a)(ii), 22-2-104(b) and (d), 22-2-108, 22-2-109(a)
and by creating a new subsection (d), 22-2-111(a),
22-2-113(e), 22-3-102(a)(intro) and by creating a new
subsection (f), 22-3-109(a), 22-4-402(a) and (e), 22-5-101,
22-5-209, 22-5-215, 22-5-219(a) and by creating new
subsections (c) and (d), 22-6-101, 22-6-102(a), 22-6-105,
22-6-107, 22-7-101, 22-8-101(a), (b) and (d), 22-8-116,
22-16-102(a), 22-16-103(c)(i), 22-16-106(a) and (b),
22-16-118, 22-16-121(a), 22-16-122(c) and (f),
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
22-17-102(a)(intro), 22-21-103, 22-21-104, 22-22-202(a),
22-23-303, 22-25-101(d)(i)(C), 22-25-102(c)(i)(B), (j) and
(m), 22-25-104, 22-25-105(a), 22-25-106(a)(i), (b)(i),
(h)(intro) and (ii), 22-25-107(b), 22-26-113(a)(intro) and
22-29-110(a) and (b) are amended to read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xxx) "Residence" is the place of a person's
actual habitation. The construction of this term shall be
governed by the following rules:

(E) If a person removes moves to another
state with the intent of making it his residence, he loses
his residence in Wyoming; except that in a general election
year, if his registration is valid in Wyoming when he
leaves this state and he is unable to qualify under the
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
laws of his new state of residence to vote at the primary
or general election, he shall be deemed to have retained
residence in Wyoming for purposes of voting by absentee
ballot in the primary, runoff or general election;

(lii) "Unsuccessful candidate" means a person
who did not win the election but whose name was printed on
the ballot and who received one (1) or more votes in the
primary or runoff election;

22-2-101. Applicability and construction of Election
Code generally.

(a) Chapters 1 through 28 of this Election Code apply
to the following elections:

(ii) Primary elections and runoff elections;

22-2-104. Election dates.

(b) A primary election shall be held at the regular
polling places for each precinct on the first Tuesday after
the third first Monday in August May in general election
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
years for the nomination of candidates for partisan and
nonpartisan offices to be filled at the succeeding general
election and for the election of major party precinct
committeemen and committeewomen. If required under W.S.
22-5-601, a runoff election shall be held at the regular
polling places for each precinct on the first Tuesday after
the second Monday in August in general election years.

(d) Every bond election shall be held on the same day
as a primary election or a general election, or on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in May or November.,
or on the first Tuesday after the third Monday in August.

22-2-108. Secretary of state to certify officers to
be elected.

Between the twenty-fourth day of April and the third day of
May in each general Not less than one hundred (100) days
and not more than one hundred ten (110) days before the
primary election, year, the secretary of state shall
transmit to the county clerk of each county a certified
list stating what officers, other than county and precinct
officers, are to be nominated or elected at the election.
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383

22-2-109. County clerk to publish proclamation.

(a) Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91)
and eighty-one (81) days before each primary election, the
county clerk in each county shall publish at least once in
a newspaper of general circulation in the county and post
in the county clerk's office and at the place where each
municipality within the county regularly holds its council
meetings a proclamation setting forth the date of the
election, the offices to be filled at the election
including the terms of the offices, the number of persons
required by law to fill the offices, the filing deadline
for the offices and the requirements for filing statements
of campaign contributions and expenditures. The
proclamation shall also include the aforementioned
information regarding offices to be filled at the general
election, the date that a runoff election would occur, if
necessary, and any other pertinent primary election
information. In addition, the description of any ballot
proposition submitted to the voters of the state, a
political subdivision thereof, county or other district
shall be included.
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383

(d) Not later than fifteen (15) days before any
runoff election required by W.S. 22-5-601, the county clerk
in each applicable county shall publish at least once in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county and post in
the county clerk's office and at the place where each
municipality within the county regularly holds its council
meetings a notice of election setting forth the date of the
runoff election and a sample ballot pursuant to W.S.
22-6-105.

22-2-111. Employees time off to vote.

(a) Any person entitled to vote at any primary,
runoff or general election or special election to fill a
vacancy in the office of representatives in the congress of
the United States is, on the day of such election, entitled
to absent himself from any service or employment in which
he is then engaged or employed for a period of one (1)
hour, other than meal hours, the hour being at the
convenience of the employer, between the time of opening
and closing of the polls. Such elector shall not, because
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
of so absenting himself, lose any pay, providing he
actually casts his legal vote.

22-2-113. Availability and form of registry lists;
use of copies; election record; purging.

(e) The county clerks shall purge and update voter
registration information on the voter registration system
not later than the fifteenth day of February each following
a general election year and shall notify the secretary of
state upon completion, but not later than February 15 of
each the year following a general election year.

22-3-102. Qualifications; temporary registration.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this
section, a person may register to vote not less than
fourteen (14) days before an election, at any election
specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii) or as
provided by W.S. 22-3-117, who satisfies the following
qualifications:

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(f) To qualify as an eligible voter in a runoff
election required by W.S. 22-5-601, the person shall be a
registered voter in the jurisdiction where a runoff
election is being held and shall be registered in the same
political party by which they were eligible to vote at the
time of the applicable primary election, including voters
who registered at the polls at the primary election. This
subsection shall not prevent a person from registering to
vote under subsection (a) of this section for the runoff
election if the person was not registered to vote at the
time of the applicable primary election and did not
register at the polls at the primary election.

22-3-109. Certification and transmittal of poll
lists; posting of registry lists.

(a) Not less than ten (10) days before any election,
the county clerk shall certify and transmit to the officer
in charge of each election at his request the necessary
poll lists for the precincts or areas involved in the
election. Not less than ten (10) days prior to the primary
and general elections and not less than five (5) days
before a runoff election required by W.S. 22-5-601, the
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
county clerks shall upon request deliver up to three (3) a
poll lists list for each precinct in the county to the
county chairman of each political party in the respective
counties.

22-4-402. Petition; form; validity.

(a) Any group of persons desiring to form a new
political party within this state shall file a petition
with the secretary of state not later than June February 1
in any general election year in which the party seeks to
qualify for the general election ballot.

(e) The petition shall be circulated no earlier than
April January 1 of the year preceding the general election.

22-5-101. How candidates nominated.

Nominations of candidates for all offices filled at a
general election, except school and community college
district offices and special district offices, may be made
by primary or runoff election as applicable, by petition
for nomination as an independent candidate as provided in
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
W.S. 22-5-301 through 22-5-308 or by convention as provided
in W.S. 22-4-303 and 22-4-406.

22-5-209. Time for filing nomination applications;
certified list.

An application for nomination shall be filed not more than
ninety-six (96) ninety (90) days and not later than
eighty-one (81) eighty (80) days next preceding the primary
election. Not later than sixty-eight (68) seventy-five (75)
days before a primary election, the secretary of state
shall transmit to each county clerk a certified list of
persons whose applications have been filed in the office of
the secretary of state stating as to each his name, age,
address, office sought and party affiliation.

22-5-215. Nomination of partisan candidates and
write-in candidates.

Except as provided in W.S. 22-5-601, on each party ballot
the candidate or candidates equal in number to the number
to be elected to each office who receive the largest number
of votes shall be nominated and shall be entitled to have
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
their names printed on the ballot for the next general
election. A write-in candidate shall not be nominated and
shall not be entitled to have his name printed on the
ballot for the next general election unless he received at
least twenty-five (25) write-in votes in the primary
election and is a registered voter in the political party
for which he was nominated on the day of the primary
election. An unsuccessful candidate for office at a primary
election whose name is printed on any party ballot may not
accept nomination for the same office at the next general
election.

22-5-219. Further action by nominees or elect not
required; exception.

(a) Candidates nominated and major party precinct
committeemen and committeewomen elected at a primary or
runoff election shall be deemed nominated or elected
without further action. In addition, each write-in
candidate nominated at a primary election shall comply with
the provisions of W.S. 22-16-106.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(c) Major party precinct committeemen and
committeewomen elected at a primary election shall be
deemed elected without further action.

(d) Each write-in candidate nominated at a primary or
runoff election shall comply with the provisions of W.S.
22-16-106.

22-6-101. Certification of candidates nominated;
printing of names.

Not less than sixty (60) days before each general election
the secretary of state shall transmit to each county clerk
under party headings a certified list of the name and
address of each person nominated by primary or runoff
election as indicated by the state canvass, the name of
each person nominated by provisional or minor party
convention, the name of each independent candidate
qualifying for nomination by petition, and the office
sought. The names of these candidates shall be printed on
the official ballot of the general election.

22-6-102. County clerk to print ballots; exception.
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383

(a) The county clerk shall print official ballots for
his the county, for all primary, runoff, general and
special elections.

22-6-105. Sample ballots; publication.

The officer providing the official ballots shall publish
sample ballots at least once in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district in which each primary, runoff
and general election is held within two (2) weeks prior to
the election. This notice shall also state that the names
of candidates will be rotated on the official ballots and
will not always appear in the order indicated in the sample
ballots.

22-6-107. Time for possession of ballots and labels.

(a) Official ballots for primary, runoff and general
elections shall be in the county clerk's possession
forty-five (45) days before the election. If a clerk is
unable to obtain ballots on time, the secretary of state
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
shall provide by rule and regulation for the clerk to
obtain and use substitute ballots.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section,
county clerks shall make official absentee ballots for
primary, runoff and general elections available to voters
with rights under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens
Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. 1973ff, and future acts
amendatory or supplemental thereto, forty-five (45) days
before the election.

22-7-101. Election districts.

The board of county commissioners with the advice or
recommendation of the county clerk, no later than its first
meeting in May the third Tuesday in January in every
general election year shall divide the county into not more
than thirty (30) election districts. Each district shall
be designated by number. Election districts shall be
changed only at this designated meeting.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
22-8-101. Notice of election officials needed; county
chairmen to submit list of names; municipal clerks list of
names appointment.

(a) Not later than the third first Tuesday of April
February in each general election year, each county clerk
shall notify the county chairmen of the major and minor
political parties in the county of the number of election
judges and counting board members and alternates needed for
the ensuing two (2) year term.

(b) Not later than the third first Tuesday of May
March in each general election year the county chairman of
each major and minor political party in each county may
certify to the county clerk a list of registered electors
residing in the county and affiliated with the party, and a
list of persons who are at least sixteen (16) years of age
who otherwise meet all requirements for qualification as an
elector, who are willing to serve as a judge of election or
as a member of a counting board.

(d) Not later than June 30 March 31, the county clerk
on each general election year shall appoint judges of
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
election and counting boards and alternates from lists
submitted by the county chairmen of the major and minor
political parties.

22-8-116. Compensation.

Judges of election and members of counting boards shall be
compensated for services at a rate to be determined by the
board of county commissioners at the June not later than
the board's March meeting and stated on the notice sent to
each nominee. The rate shall be not less than the state
minimum wage. Compensation shall begin one (1) hour before
a member assumes his duties. The election official who
delivers the returns shall receive additional compensation
for necessary travel beyond ten (10) miles at the rate
authorized for county employees. If a flat rate is paid,
said sum shall not be less than the state hourly minimum
wage multiplied by the number of hours the polls are open
plus one (1) hour.

22-16-102. Abstract of vote; returns not filed.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(a) The county clerk shall prepare an abstract of the
vote of all precincts in the county following a county
primary, runoff, special or general election. The abstract
shall contain all items required in W.S.
22-16-103(c)(viii).

22-16-103. County canvass procedures.

(c) The county canvassing board shall:

(i) Meet as soon as all returns have been
received and abstracted, but if any provisional ballots
have been cast in the county, not before the time has
passed for provisional voters to document their eligibility
to register or to vote. The board shall meet at a time and
place designated by the county clerk, but no later than the
first Friday second Wednesday following the election;

22-16-106. Write-in candidates.

(a) Each write-in candidate nominated at a primary or
runoff election, who has not previously filed an
application for nomination shall accept nomination by
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
filing an application for nomination and paying the filing
fee in the office in which he would have been required to
file an application for nomination to that office.

(b) The chief election officer shall notify a
write-in candidate who has been nominated at a primary or
runoff election within forty-eight (48) hours after the
canvassing board meets. Notification may be delivered by
United States postal service or other generally accepted
mail delivery method to the last known address of the
write-in candidate, email or other electronic means that
provide actual notice to the write-in candidate, or service
as provided under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.
Each notification provided under this section shall inform
the write-in candidate that failure to timely respond will
result in forfeiture of nomination. Failure of the
successful write-in candidate to accept the nomination in
the manner prescribed in subsection (a) of this section
within five (5) days after delivery, attempted delivery or
service under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, as
computed pursuant to W.S. 22-2-110, results in the
successful write-in candidate not appearing on the general
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
election ballot, but does not result in a vacancy which can
be filled.

22-16-118. Meeting of state canvassing board.

The state canvassing board shall meet no later than the
second third Wednesday following the election. The
secretary of state shall send a messenger to obtain
official county abstracts not filed in a reasonable length
of time. The canvassing board shall meet at the time and
place set by the secretary of state. The board shall review
the state abstracts prepared by the secretary of state,
compare them with the tabulation and materials prepared by
the secretary of state, resolve any tie votes, and certify
the abstract as the official state canvass.

22-16-121. Certificates of nomination and election
following state or county canvass.

(a) When the state canvass is concluded, the
secretary of state shall issue a certificate of nomination
to each candidate nominated at a primary or runoff election
and certify the names of nominees as provided in W.S.
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
22-6-101. If a runoff election is required under W.S.
22-5-601, not later than two (2) days following the state
canvassing board meeting for the primary election, the
secretary of state shall provide notice of the runoff
election and nominations to the county clerks. When the
county canvass is concluded, the county clerk shall issue a
certificate of nomination to each candidate nominated at a
primary election or by petition.

22-16-122. Election declared null and void; special
election.

(c) If only certain precincts are allowed to vote in
the special election, the votes received in the special
election shall be added to the unofficial results not
declared null and void for that office from the initial
primary, runoff or general election or other special
election.

(f) The special election shall be held if necessary
no later than the third Tuesday after the primary, runoff,
general or other special election and may be held by a
special mail ballot election as provided in W.S. 22-16-123.
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
The special election shall be conducted by the county clerk
as nearly as possible in the manner of a primary, runoff or
general election, except only those registered in the
precinct at the close of polls on the election day of the
primary, runoff, general or other special election in
question shall be permitted to vote in the special
election. If the election is held as a special mail ballot
election, the election shall be held as provided in W.S.
22-16-123.

22-17-102. Commencement by verified petition;
contents.

(a) Election contests for all primary and runoff
election offices and all general election offices other
than state legislators, United States president and
vice-president and presidential elector, may be commenced
by the contestant filing with the clerk of the district
court of the county, within fourteen (14) days after the
results of the election have been certified by the
canvassing board, a verified petition setting forth
specifically:

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
22-21-103. How bond question to be submitted to
electors; contents.

Each bond question shall be submitted to a vote of the
qualified electors of the political subdivision. Every bond
election shall be held on the same day as a primary
election or a general election, or on the Tuesday next
following the first Monday in May or November., or on the
Tuesday next following the third Monday in August. Not less
than one hundred ten (110) days before a bond election, the
political subdivision shall provide written notification to
the county clerk specifying the date of the election and
the bond question. The bond question shall state the
purpose of the bonds, the maximum principal amount thereof,
the maximum number of years allowed for the indebtedness
and the maximum rate of interest to be paid thereon. The
secretary of state may promulgate reasonable rules
for conducting bond elections where the election is not
held at the same time as the general or primary election.

22-21-104. Publication or posting of election notice;
contents.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91) days
before a bond election held in conjunction with a primary
or other August election and between ninety (90) and
seventy (70) days before a bond election held in
conjunction with a May, general or other November election,
the county clerk shall publish notice of the election at
least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the
political subdivision. If there is no newspaper of general
circulation in the political subdivision, notice shall be
posted at each polling place in the political subdivision
between ninety (90) and seventy (70) days before the
election. Any notice of election hereunder shall specify
the name of the political subdivision, the date, time and
place of election, the question or questions to be
submitted, and the fact that only qualified electors of the
political subdivision may vote thereon. If a bond
election is being held within a political subdivision at
the same time and place as a regular or other election, the
notice of bond election may, at the discretion of the
county clerk, be combined with and given in the same manner
as the notice of the regular or other election in such
political subdivision.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
22-22-202. Filing of application; form.

(a) A qualified elector may be nominated for the
office of school district trustee or member of a community
college board by filing an application for election in the
office of the county clerk not more than ninety (90) nor
less than seventy (70) eighty (80) days prior to the
election. The application shall be in substantially the
following form:

APPLICATION FOR ELECTION FOR SCHOOL OR
COMMUNITY COLLEGE TRUSTEE

I, the undersigned, swear or affirm that I was born on
...., ....(year), and that I have been a resident of the
State of Wyoming since ...., and that I am a registered
voter of the .... school district or community college
district (and resident of trustee residence area or
subdistrict ...., if any), residing at ...., and I do
hereby request that my name, ...., be printed on the ballot
of the election to be held on the .... day of ....,
....(year), as a candidate for the office of .... for a
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
term of .... years. I hereby declare that if I am elected,
I will qualify for the office.

Dated: ....

.......... (Signature of Candidate)

.... Name as it is to appear on the ballot

22-23-303. Certification of candidates; names on
ballots.

Not later than sixty-eight (68) seventy-five (75) days
prior to the primary election, the municipal clerk shall
certify to the county clerk the names of all qualified
candidates for nomination at the municipal primary election
and the office they seek. The number of municipal
candidates the voters are entitled to vote for at the
primary election is the number of candidates to be elected
to municipal offices at the general election.

22-25-101. Definitions; statement of formation.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(d) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Electioneering communication" means, except
as otherwise provided by paragraph (ii) of this subsection,
any communication, including an advertisement, which is
publicly distributed as a billboard, brochure, email,
mailing, magazine, pamphlet or periodical, as the component
of an internet website or newspaper or by the facilities of
a cable television system, electronic communication
network, internet streaming service, radio station,
telephone or cellular system, television station or
satellite system and which:

(C) Is made within thirty (30) calendar
days of a primary or runoff election, sixty (60) calendar
days of a general election or twenty-one (21) calendar days
of any special election during which the candidate or
ballot proposition will appear on the ballot; and

22-25-102. Contribution of funds or election
assistance restricted; limitation on contributions; right
to communicate; civil penalty.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no
individual other than the candidate, or the candidate's
immediate family shall contribute directly or indirectly:

(i) To any candidate for statewide political
office, or to any candidate for statewide political
office's candidate's campaign committee:

(B) Except as otherwise provided in this
subparagraph, no contribution for the general election may
be given prior to the date for the primary runoff election.
This subparagraph shall not apply to any candidate
unopposed in the primary election, successfully nominated
at the primary election where a runoff election is not
required or nominated in accordance with W.S. 22-4-303 or
22-5-301.

(j) For purposes of subsection (c) of this section
the primary, runoff, general and special elections shall be
deemed separate elections. No candidate for political
office shall accept, directly or indirectly, contributions
which violate subsection (c) of this section.
Contributions to a candidate's campaign committee shall be
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
considered to be contributions to the candidate.
Subsection (c) of this section does not limit political
contributions by political parties, nor expenditures by a
candidate from his own funds nor from his candidate's
campaign committee funds.

(m) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no
political action committee shall contribute directly or
indirectly more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per
election to any candidate for political office other than
statewide political office. For purposes of this
subsection the primary, runoff, general and special
elections shall be deemed separate elections. No candidate
for political office shall accept, directly or indirectly,
contributions which violate this subsection. Contributions
to a candidate's campaign committee shall be considered to
be contributions to the candidate. This subsection does
not limit political contributions by political parties, nor
expenditures by a candidate from his own funds nor from his
candidate's campaign committee funds.

22-25-104. Restriction on party funds in primary and
runoff elections.
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383

No political party funds shall be expended directly or
indirectly in the aid of the nomination of any one (1)
person as against another person of the same political
party running in the a primary or runoff election.

22-25-105. Campaign reporting forms; instructions and
warning.

(a) The secretary of state shall prescribe the forms
for reporting contributions and expenditures for primary,
runoff, general and special election campaigns, together
with written instructions for completing the form and a
warning that violators are subject to criminal charges and
civil penalties if the forms are not completed and filed
pursuant to law. The forms along with instructions and
warning shall be distributed to the county clerk and shall
be made available, whether in electronic or paper form, by
the county clerk to each person filing an application for
nomination in his office and to each political action
committee and candidate's campaign committee required to
file with the county clerk.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
22-25-106. Filing of campaign reports.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (g)
and (j) of this section and in addition to other reports
required by this subsection:

(i) Every candidate, whether successful or not,
shall file an itemized statement of contributions and
expenditures at least seven (7) days but not more than
fourteen (14) days before any primary, general or special
election, including a runoff election if applicable. Any
contribution received or expenditure made after the
statement has been filed, through the day of the election,
whether a primary, general or special election and
including a runoff election if applicable, shall be filed
as an amendment to the statement within ten (10) days after
the election;

(b) Reports of itemized statements of contributions
and expenditures, and statements of termination shall be
made with the appropriate filing officers specified under
W.S. 22-25-107 and in accordance with the following:

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
(i) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, any political action committee and candidate's
campaign committee, or any political action committee
formed under the law of another state that contributes to a
Wyoming political action committee or to a candidate's
campaign committee, that expends any funds in any primary,
runoff, general or special election, shall file an itemized
statement of contributions and expenditures at least seven
(7) days but not more than fourteen (14) days before any
primary, runoff, general or special election. Any
contribution received or expenditure made after the
statement has been filed, through the day of the election,
whether a primary, runoff, general or special election,
shall be filed as an amendment to the statement within ten
(10) days after the election;

(h) An organization that expends in excess of one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) in any primary, runoff,
general or special election to cause an independent
expenditure or electioneering communication to be made
shall file an itemized statement of contributions and
expenditures with the appropriate filing office under W.S.
22-25-107. The statement shall:
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383

(ii) Be filed at least seven (7) days but not
more than fourteen (14) days before any primary, runoff,
general or special election. Any contribution received or
expenditure made after the statement has been filed,
through the day of the election, whether a primary, runoff,
general or special election, shall be filed as an amendment
to the statement within ten (10) days after the election;

22-25-107. Where reports to be filed.

(b) Reports required to be filed at least seven (7)
days before any primary, runoff, general or special
election shall be filed electronically.

22-26-113. Electioneering too close to a polling
place.

(a) Electioneering too close to a polling place or
absentee polling place under W.S. 22-9-125 when voting is
being conducted, consists of any form of campaigning,
including the display of campaign signs or distribution of
campaign literature, the soliciting of signatures to any
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
petition or the canvassing or polling of voters, except
exit polling by news media, within one hundred (100) yards
on the day of a primary, runoff, general or special
election and within one hundred (100) feet on all other
days, of any public entrance to the building in which the
polling place is located. This section shall not apply to
bumper stickers affixed to a vehicle while parked within or
passing through the distance specified in this subsection,
provided that:

22-29-110. County clerk to publish proclamation;
filing period.

(a) Between one hundred one (101) and ninety-one (91)
days before an organizational election held in conjunction
with a primary or other August election, between ninety
(90) and seventy (70) days before an organizational
election held in conjunction with a May, general, November
or mail ballot election held at any other time, the county
clerk shall publish at least once in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county in which all or part of the
proposed district is situated a proclamation setting forth
the date of the election, what county clerk is the filing
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
officer, the question of formation, what offices are to be
filled including the terms of the offices, the
filing period for the offices and other pertinent election
information. Minor errors in the proclamation shall not
invalidate the forthcoming election.

(b) Between ninety-six (96) and eighty-one (81) days
before a formation election held in conjunction with a
primary or other August election, between ninety (90) and
seventy (70) days before a formation election held in
conjunction with a May, general, November or mail ballot
election held at any other time, candidates may file an
application for election in the office of the county clerk.
The principal act shall determine who is eligible to be a
candidate. The application shall be in substantially the
following form:

APPLICATION FOR ELECTION
SPECIAL DISTRICT DIRECTOR

I, the undersigned, swear or affirm that I was born on
...., (year); that I have been a resident of .... district
since ...., residing at ....; that I am an elector
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
or landowner (check which one for eligibility) of said
district and I do hereby request that my name, ...., be
printed on the ballot of the formation (or other) election
to be held on .... day of ...., (year) as a candidate for
the office of director for a term of .... years. I hereby
declare that if I am elected, I will qualify for the
office.

Dated ....

........................
Signature of Candidate

Section 3. The joint corporations, elections and
political subdivisions interim committee shall review the
dates for primary elections and runoff elections as
specified in sections 1 and 2 of this act. The committee
shall consult with the secretary of state and county clerks
to determine whether the dates for primary elections and
runoff elections will give sufficient time for candidates
to register in an election year following the redistricting
of the legislature. If the committee determines that the
dates will not give sufficient time for candidates to
HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
register in an election year following the redistricting of
the legislature, the committee shall make recommendations
for alternative dates of runoff or primary elections or
make any other recommendations for statutory revisions that
the committee determines would allow for a runoff election
in election years following the redistricting of the
legislature. The committee shall report the results of the
review under this section to management council not later
than October 1, 2026.

Section 4. There is appropriated two million dollars
($2,000,000.00) from the general fund to the runoff
election account as created by W.S. 22-5-601(h) in section
1 of this act. This appropriation shall not revert as
provided by W.S. 22-5-601(h). The secretary of state may
request appropriations to the account in the agency's
biennial budget request submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013 as
necessary to implement runoff elections under W.S. 22-5-601
as created by section 1 of this act.

HB0249

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0383
Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Sections 1, 2 and 4 of this act are effective
July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0249